Hawaii statutes.
§88-166 Computation; service as police
officer, firefighter, or bandsman. To entitle anyone to be retired because
of time of service only, the time served by the person upon the regularly
constituted police force, fire department, or band on which the person shall
then be serving, or of the Territory or the Republic of Hawaii, its
predecessor, shall be computed, but all times so served by the person before,
as well as after May 2, 1917, shall be included in the computation. No
time served by any person as a special police officer or a police officer
solely paid by any private person, or as a merchant police officer, shall be
considered in computing the length of service of the person in the police
force. [L 1917, c 220, pt of §3; RL 1925, pt of §2163; RL 1935, pt of §7905; RL
1945, pt of §6173; RL 1955, §6-146; HRS §88-166; am L 1983, c 124, §15; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next